src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Wasco-Wishram language nouns inflect in number and cases.

LEXICON Cases
 +N+Sg+Nom:0   #     ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:i   #     ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:at  #     ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:iat #     ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:as  #     ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:ias #     ;
         #:0   Nouns ; ! Normally going via a R lexicon adding compound tags.

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
