src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
!! Nouns
!  -----
!! Nouns in the Wasco-Wishram language refer to objects or sets of objects, qualities, states or ideas.

LEXICON Nouns
noun+N:noun    Cases   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
